Colorado, session 2026A, HB1285.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-71-103, amend
(2)(c) as follows:
27-71-103. Mental health residential facilities - additional beds
- definition.
(2) (c) The state department, in collaboration with the behavioral
health administration and the department of health care policy and
financing, shall establish criteria for admissions and discharge planning,
quality assurance monitoring, appropriate length of stay, and compliance
with applicable federal law. For the mental health residential facilities
created pursuant to this section, admission criteria for facilities must
include:
(I) Prioritization of people with serious mental illness who have
complex or co-occurring conditions as defined by the state department;
and
(II) For treatment beds that do not serve individuals covered under
a home- and community-based waiver, offering priority placement to
individuals under a certification for short-term or extended short-term
treatment pursuant to section 27-65-107 or 27-65-108 and long-term care
and treatment pursuant to section 27-65-109 on an outpatient basis; AND
(III) FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE REQUIRED TO REGISTER THEIR
RESIDENCE PURSUANT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE "COLORADO SEX
OFFENDER REGISTRATION ACT", ARTICLE 22 OF TITLE 16, A PROHIBITION
-2- HB26-1285

ON ADMITTING THE INDIVIDUAL TO A MENTAL HEALTH RESIDENTIAL
FACILITY LOCATED WITHIN ONE THOUSAND FEET OF A SCHOOL. THE
ONE-THOUSAND-FOOT DISTANCE MUST BE COMPUTED BY DIRECT
MEASUREMENT FROM THE NEAREST PROPERTY LINE OF THE LAND USED
FOR SCHOOL PURPOSES TO THE NEAREST PORTION OF THE MENTAL HEALTH
RESIDENTIAL FACILITY, USING A ROUTE OF DIRECT PEDESTRIAN ACCESS. AS
USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c)(III), "SCHOOL" MEANS A PUBLIC,
PAROCHIAL, OR PRIVATE SCHOOL THAT PROVIDES A BASIC ACADEMIC
EDUCATION IN COMPLIANCE WITH SCHOOL ATTENDANCE LAWS FOR
STUDENTS IN ANY OF GRADES ONE THROUGH TWELVE.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-3- HB26-1285